Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 4 Active Duty Powers

38-2-300.
Right of way for troops; exceptions; penalty.

The commanding officer of any force of the organized militia which is parading or performing any military duty in any street or highway may require any or all persons in the street or highway to yield the right of way to the militia, provided the carriage of the United States mail, the legitimate functions of the police, and the progress and operations of ambulances, fire departments, and fire engines and apparatus shall not be interfered with thereby. It shall be unlawful for all others to hinder, delay, or obstruct any unit of the organized militia wherever parading or performing any military duty, or to attempt to do so.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1402; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 97, 111.

38-2-301.
Closing places where firearms and ammunition sold, where disorder likely to occur; penalty for not obeying closing order.

Whenever any force of the organized militia is or has been called out for the performance of any duty under Code Section 38-2-6, it shall be lawful for the commanding officer of the force, if in his judgment the maintenance of law and order in the area into which the force has been ordered will be promoted thereby, to close places where arms and ammunition are sold and all places where disorder is likely to occur.

Any person who sells or dispenses arms or ammunition in violation of an order of a commanding officer under the authority of subsection (a) of this Code section or who maintains a place ordered to be closed under such authority shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1301; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 98, 112.

38-2-302.
Control of streets in case of riot, rout, mob, tumult, or unlawful assembly; penalty for remaining on or failing to depart streets.

Whenever any force of the organized militia is or has been called out for the performance of any duty under this chapter, it shall be lawful for the commanding officer of the force, if it is deemed advisable to do so in subduing or preventing any riot, rout, mob, tumult, or unlawful assembly or the outbreak thereof, to prohibit all persons from occupying or passing any street, road, or place in the vicinity of the riot, rout, mob, tumult, or unlawful assembly, or the place where the same is threatening, or where the force may be at the time being; and otherwise to regulate the passage and occupancy of the streets and places.

Any person after being duly informed of any prohibition or regulation authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section for closing or otherwise controlling streets, roads, or places who attempts to go or to remain on such street, road, or place, or who fails to depart after being warned, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1308, 86-9908; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 5, 56; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 99, 113.

Cross references.

Rioting generally, §

16-11-30

.

Unlawful assembly, §

16-11-33

.

38-2-303.
Dispersion of mob; orders; where order unnecessary; penalty for failure to disperse.

Before using any military force in suppression of any riot, rout, tumult, mob, or other lawless or unlawful assembly or combination, it shall be the duty of the officer in command of the force, or some person deputed by him, to command the persons composing the riotous or unlawful assembly or mob to disperse and return peaceably to their abodes and businesses. In no case shall it be necessary to use any set or particular form of words in ordering the dispersion of any riotous, tumultuous, or unlawful assembly, nor shall any command be necessary when the officer or person, in order to give it, would be put in imminent danger of bodily harm or loss of life or where the unlawful assembly or mob is engaged in the commission or perpetration of any felony, in assaulting or attacking any civil officer or person called to aid him in the preservation of the peace, or is otherwise engaged in actual violence to person or property.

Any person or persons composing or taking part in any riot, rout, mob, tumult, or lawless combination or assembly who, after being duly commanded to disperse as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, willfully and intentionally fail to do so shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1304, 86-9906; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 5, 54; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 100, 114; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 38.

Cross references.

Rioting generally, §

16-11-30

.

Unlawful assembly, §

16-11-33

.

38-2-304.
Duty of citizens to disperse when shot fired or missile thrown; penalty; felony upon failure to disperse after order.

Whenever any shot is fired or missile thrown at, against, or upon any force of the organized militia or against any officer or member thereof assembling or assembled for the purpose of performing any duties under this chapter, it shall forthwith be the duty of every person in the assemblage from which the shot is fired or the missile thrown to disperse immediately and retire therefrom without awaiting any order to do so.

Any person failing to retire immediately from any assemblage after a shot has been fired or a missile thrown in any manner mentioned in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and any person so remaining in the assemblage after being duly commanded to disperse as provided in Code Section 38-2-303 shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1307, 86-9907; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 5, 55; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 101, 115.

Cross references.

Rioting generally, §

16-11-30

.

Unlawful assembly, §

16-11-33

.

38-2-305.
Authority of commanding officer to order vicinity of jail, building, or other place, off limits to unauthorized personnel; arrest; penalty.

The commanding officer of any force of the organized militia guarding any jail, building, or other place or escorting any prisoner or performing any other act of duty may, if he deems it advisable, prescribe a reasonable distance in the vicinity of the jail, building, or other place, or escort of the prisoner within which unauthorized persons shall not come. Any person coming within the limits so prescribed may be placed in arrest by the military authorities.

Any person coming within the limits prescribed by the commanding officer of any body or force of the organized militia under subsection (a) of this Code section without the permission of the officer, or refusing to depart after being ordered to do so, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1403, 86-9909; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 24, 57; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 102, 116.

38-2-306.
Prohibited conduct in area of military duty performance.

Any person who after due warning trespasses upon any armory, arsenal, camp, range, base, or other facility of the organized militia or other place where any force of the organized militia is performing military duty, or who in any manner interrupts or molests the discharge of military duties by any member or force of the organized militia, or who interrupts or prevents the passage of troops of the organized militia, or who insults, by jeer or otherwise, any member of the organized militia may be placed in arrest by any officer of the force performing the military duty at the place where the offense is committed and delivered to the proper civil authorities.

The commanding officer of any force of the organized militia performing military duty in or at any armory, arsenal, camp, range, base, or other facility of the organized militia or other place where the force is performing military duty may prohibit persons from hawking, peddling, vending, selling, or auctioning goods, wares, merchandise, food products, or beverages and may prohibit all gambling, or the sale or use of spirituous beverages, or the establishment or maintenance of a disorderly place within the limits of the armory, arsenal, camp, range, base, or other facility of the organized militia or other place where the force is performing military duty or within such limits not exceeding one mile therefrom as he may prescribe.

Any person who violates any part of subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1405, 86-9910; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 24, 58; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 103, 117.

Cross references.

Criminal trespass generally, §

16-7-21

.

38-2-307.
Power of National Guard members to effect an arrest.

Members of the National Guard may, at the discretion of the Governor, have the same powers of arrest and apprehension as do law enforcement officers when called to active duty to respond to emergencies pursuant to Code Section 38-2-6, 38-2-7, 45-12-31, or 45-12-34 or pursuant to any other provision of state or federal law other than Title 10 of the United States Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 228, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 105, § 3.

Cross references.

Power of arrest generally, T. 17, C. 4.